Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1017
Cosmetology establishment, defined.

Cosmetology establishment means a cosmetology salon, a mobile cosmetology salon, an esthetics salon, a school of cosmetology, a school of esthetics, an apprentice salon, or any other place in which any or all of the practices of cosmetology are performed on members of the general public for compensation or in which instruction or training in any or all of the practices of cosmetology is given, except when such practices constitute nonvocational training.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 13;

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 7;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 7;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-352;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 279;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 6.